Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2661HH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 619 Section 1. Section 35A.11, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0i. Air medal special plates issued pursuant 3 to section 321.34, subsection 20D. 4 Sec. 2. Section 321.34, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 5 following new subsection: 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 20D. Air medal plates. 7 a. An owner referred to in subsection 12 who was awarded 8 an air medal by the United States government may, upon written 9 application to the department and presentation of satisfactory 10 proof of the award, order special registration plates with 11 an air medal distinguishing processed emblem. The emblem 12 shall be designed by the department in consultation with the 13 adjutant general and must include a representation of the 14 air medal. The special plate fees collected by the director 15 under subsection 12, paragraph âaâ , from the annual validation 16 of letter-number designated air medal plates, and subsection 17 12, paragraph âcâ , from the issuance and annual validation of 18 personalized air medal plates shall be paid monthly to the 19 treasurer of state and deposited in the road use tax fund. The 20 treasurer of state shall transfer monthly from the statutory 21 allocations fund created under section 321.145, subsection 2, 22 to the veterans license fee fund created in section 35A.11, 23 the amount of the special fees collected under subsection 12, 24 paragraph âaâ , in the previous month for air medal plates. 25 b. Notwithstanding subsection 12, paragraph âaâ , an owner 26 who is approved for special registration plates under this 27 subsection shall be issued one set of special registration 28 plates with an air medal distinguishing processed emblem at no 29 charge. 30 c. The surviving spouse of a person who was issued special 31 plates under this subsection may continue to use or apply for 32 and use the special plates subject to registration of the 33 special plates in the surviving spouseâs name and upon payment 34 of the annual five dollar special plate fee and the regular 35 -1- LSB 2661HH (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 619 annual registration fee for the vehicle. If the surviving 1 spouse remarries, the surviving spouse shall return the special 2 plates to the department and the department shall issue regular 3 registration plates to the surviving spouse. 4